California, session 20252026, AB1305.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:(a) Poor air quality is intimately linked with negative health impacts, including respiratory illness and premature deaths, with recent studies estimating air pollution as the cause of over 100,000 premature deaths in the United States in 2011. However, the distribution of premature deaths is not equal.(b) Rural communities, farmworker communities, disadvantaged communities, tribal nations, young people, and those living at or below the poverty level often live adjacent to transportation corridors or commercial and industrial facilities with highly localized and severe pollution levels and are at the highest risk of adverse health outcomes.(c) The United States Environmental Protection Agency is responsible for establishing national ambient air quality standards for a number of criteria pollutants, including oxides of nitrogen (NOx), volatile organic compounds (VOCs), carbon monoxide (CO), oxides of sulfur (SOx), and particulate matter below 10 microns (PM10).(d) To ensure that emission sources minimize impacts on air quality, air pollution control and air quality management districts are generally required to establish emissions control technology guidelines called Best Available Control Technology (BACT) and Best Available Retrofit Control Technology (BARCT) in their districts.(e) When required as a condition of obtaining a permit to pollute, operators of emission sources agree to implement BACT and BARCT at their facilities.(f) However, there is currently no publicly verifiable mechanism to ensure that, once a permit has been issued, an operator of an emission source is implementing BACT and BARCT per the requirements of its permit.(g) Furthermore, because of limited resources, it is impossible for air pollution control and air quality management districts to monitor every permitholder for compliance with ongoing permit requirements.(h) It is essential that communities are empowered to ensure that polluters are meeting the conditions of their permits by having access to the BACT and BARCT permit requirements that emission source permitholders have committed to upholding.SEC. 2. Section 40714 is added to the Health and Safety Code, to read:40714.(a)(1)For the purposes described in subdivision (b), and to ensure that the public is able to access information in a standardized manner across all district internet websites, the Office of Data and Innovation shall develop an internet website template to present the information to be included on an internet website pursuant to subdivision (b).(2)The Office of Data and Innovation shall consult with local community groups when determining how best to design the internet website template so that district permit information is presented in a manner that does all of the following:(A)Simplifies, and displays visually, complex data wherever possible and empowers communities to assess and manage local health and safety risk.(B)Reveals patterns and trends and makes data easily and publicly accessible to third parties for analyzing those patterns and trends.(C)Enables the use of data-driven decisionmaking.(D)Maximizes accessibility.(E)Makes real-time monitoring possible.(F)Provides tools for predictive analysis and makes data easily and publicly accessible to third parties for that analysis.(G)Enhances storytelling.(b)For all40714. For all active permits required for equipment or processes that may release or control air pollutants and that require or required the use of one or more emission reduction credits, each district shall use the template developed pursuant to subdivision (a) to make publicly available on its internet website a map of permitted facilities containing information regarding those permits that includes, but is not limited to, all of the following information:(1)(a) Site address.(2)(b) Permitholder contact information.(3)(c) Name of the permitted business and the names of all parent organizations.(4)(d) The scope or description of the permitted process or equipment.(5)(e) A list of all credits used in conjunction with the identified permit, including the type and quantity of emissions allowed under the permit.(6)(f) Any best available control technology, best available retrofit control technology, or other emissions control measures identified as a requirement of the permit.SEC. 3. No reimbursement is required by this act pursuant to Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution because a local agency or school district has the authority to levy service charges, fees, or assessments sufficient to pay for the program or level of service mandated by this act, within the meaning of Section 17556 of the Government Code.